Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6029.
people of the state of michigan enact: CHAPTER XVII Sec. 1. As used in this chapter: (a) "Aircraft" means that term as defined in section 2 of the aeronautics code of the state of Michigan, 1945 PA 327, MCL 259.2. (b) "Departure" means that term as defined in section 31 of chapter IX. (c) "Homicide" means any crime in which the death of a human being is an element of that crime. (d) "Intermediate sanction" means that term as defined in section 31 of chapter IX. (e) "ORV" means that term as defined in section 81101 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.81101. (f) "Snowmobile" means that term as defined in section 82101 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.82101. (g) "Vehicle" means that term as defined in section 79 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.79. (h) "Vessel" means that term as defined in section 80104 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.80104. (i) "Veteran" means an individual who meets both of the following: (i) Served in the United States Armed Forces, including the reserve components, and, except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph, was discharged or released under conditions other than dishonorable. If an individual was discharged or released under dishonorable conditions, the individual qualifies as a veteran if the individual has been diagnosed with a service-connected substance-use disorder, military sexual trauma, traumatic brain injury, post-traumatic stress disorder, or another mental health condition. (ii) Served at least 180 days of active duty in the armed forces of the United States. Sec. 21. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, for an offense enumerated in part 2 of this chapter, determine the recommended minimum sentence range as follows: (a) Find the offense category for the offense from part 2 of this chapter. From section 22 of this chapter, determine the offense variables to be scored for that offense category and score only those offense variables for the offender as provided in part 4 of this chapter. Total those points to determine the offender's offense variable level. (b) Score all prior record variables for the offender as provided in part 5 of this chapter. Total those points to determine the offender's prior record variable level. (c) Find the offense class for the offense from part 2 of this chapter. Using the sentencing grid for that offense class in part 6 of this chapter, determine the recommended minimum sentence range from the intersection of the offender's offense variable level and prior record variable level. The recommended minimum sentence within a sentencing grid is shown as a range of months or life. (2) If the defendant was convicted of multiple offenses, subject to section 14 of chapter XI, score each offense as provided in this part. (3) If the offender is being sentenced under section 10, 11, or 12 of chapter IX, determine the offense category, offense class, offense variable level, and prior record variable level based on the underlying offense. To determine the recommended minimum sentence range, increase the upper limit of the recommended minimum sentence range determined under part 6 for the underlying offense as follows: (a) If the offender is being sentenced for a second felony, 25%. (b) If the offender is being sentenced for a third felony, 50%. (c) If the offender is being sentenced for a fourth or subsequent felony, 100%. (4) If the offender is being sentenced for a violation described in section 18 of this chapter, both of the following apply: (a) Determine the offense variable level by scoring the offense variables for the underlying offense and any additional offense variables for the offense category indicated in section 18 of this chapter. (b) Determine the offense class based on the underlying offense. If there are multiple underlying felony offenses, the offense class is the same as that of the underlying felony offense with the highest crime class. If there are multiple underlying offenses but only 1 is a felony, the offense class is the same as that of the underlying felony offense. If no underlying offense is a felony, the offense class is G. (5) If the offender is being sentenced for an attempted felony described in section 19 of this chapter, determine the offense variable level and prior record variable level based on the underlying attempted offense. (6) If the offender being sentenced is a veteran and the court finds that there is a clear connection between the offense and a condition from the offender's military service, the lower limit of the recommended minimum sentence range is 0 months. Sentencing below the lower limit of the otherwise applicable minimum sentence range is not a departure. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.